Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-511.02
Theft of rented or leased motor vehicle; where tried.

In any criminal prosecution for theft pursuant to subsection (4) of section 28-511, the accused shall be tried in the county where the motor vehicle was rented or leased or where the motor vehicle was recovered except as otherwise provided in section 25-412.03.

Laws 1995, LB 371, § 28.